Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for engineering, right-of-way acquisition, and construction to realign portions of marked Trunk Highway 73 south of the city of Cromwell. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end